da: Kontorforsyning > Arkivering og organisering > Præsentationsmapper: Konferencemapper; Porteføljer
ko: 사무용품 > 서류 정리 용품 > 포트폴리오/패드폴리오: 패드폴리오; 포트폴리오
zh-CN: 办公用品 > 文件整理 > 经理夹/多功能文件夹: 带书写板的文件夹; 档案夹
nl: Kantoorartikelen > Archiveren en indelen > Port- en padfolio's: Padfolio's; Portfolio's
pt-BR: Materiais de escritório > Arquivamento e organização > Pastas de convenção: Padfólios; Portfólios
lt-LT: Biuro reikmenys > Bylų saugojimas ir tvarkymas > Portfeliai ir dėklai dokumentams: Dėklai dokumentams; Portfeliai
bg-BG: Офис консумативи > Картотека и организация > Калъфи и конферентни папки: Конферентни папки; Калъфи
es: Material de oficina > Clasificación y organización > Portafolios: Carpetas portafolios; Atachés
vi: Văn phòng phẩm > Kẹp tài liệu và ngăn chia tài liệu > Cặp đựng hồ sơ: Cặp padfolio; Cặp portfolio
cs: Kancelářské potřeby > Třídění a uspořádání dokumentů > Aktovky a desky na papíry: Poznámkové bloky a organizéry; Spisovky
it: Forniture per ufficio > Archiviazione e organizzazione > Cartelle e portablocco: Cartelle portablocco; Cartelle
sl-SI: Pisarniški material > Zlaganje in urejanje dokumentov > Portfelji in poslovne mape: Poslovne mape; Portfelji
pl: Artykuły biurowe > Sortowanie i utrzymanie porządku > Organizery typu portfolio i padfolio: Okładki na dokumenty; Aktówki na dokumenty
fi: Toimistotarvikkeet > Arkistointi ja järjestys > Kansiot ja pikkukansiot: Pikkukansiot; Kansiot
sv: Kontorsmaterial > Arkiv och organisering > Dokumentportföljer och skrivportföljer: Konferensmappar; Portföljer
de: Bürobedarf > Ablage & Organisation > Akten- & Schreibmappen: Padfolios; Portfolios
nb: Kontormateriell > Arkivering og organisering > Portfolioer og padfolioer: Padfolioer; Portfolioer
en: Office Supplies > Filing & Organization > Portfolios & Padfolios: Padfolios; Portfolios
ja: オフィス用品 > ファイル・バインダー > 書類ケース・ノートパッド付きファイル: パドフォリオ; ポートフォリオ
ro-RO: Consumabile de birou > Clasare și organizare > Portofolii și caiete de notițe: Caiete de notițe; Portofolii
pt-PT: Materiais de escritório > Arquivo e organização > Porta-documentos e porta-documentos com bloco: Porta-documentos com bloco; Porta-documentos
ru: Товары для офиса и канцтовары > Органайзеры и товары для хранения документов > Деловые папки: Папки-сумки; Папки-портфели
sk-SK: Kancelárske potreby > Kartotéka a organizácia > Fascikle a zápisníky: Zápisníky; Fascikle
hr-HR: Uredski materijal > Pohrana i organizacija > Portfelji i padfoliji: Padfoliji; Portfelji
tr: Büro Malzemeleri > Dosyalama ve Organizasyon > Portfolyo Dosyaları ve Bloknotlu Dosyalar: Portföy Çantaları; Portföyler
zh-TW: 辦公室用品 > 收納整理用品 > 檔案冊: 文件夾; 資料夾
hu: Irodai kellékek > Tárolás és rendezés > Portfóliók és mappák: Mappák; Portfóliók
th: อุปกรณ์สำนักงาน > การจัดเก็บเอกสารและการจัดระเบียบ > พอร์ตโฟลิโอและแพ็ดโฟลิโอ: แฟ้มใส่เอกสาร; กระเป๋าใส่เอกสาร
el: Προμήθειες γραφείου > Αρχειοθέτηση & οργάνωση > Χαρτοφύλακες & padfolios: Padfolios; Χαρτοφύλακες (Portfolios)
fr: Fournitures de bureau > Classement et organisation > Portfolios et Conférenciers: Conférenciers; Portfolios